Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.40.195

Treasurer—Appointment, term, duties, bonds.

Each board of state college trustees shall appoint a treasurer who shall be the financial officer of the board and who shall hold office during the pleasure of the board. Each treasurer shall render a true and faithful account of all moneys received and paid out by him or her, and shall give bond for the faithful performance of the duties of his or her office in such amount as the trustees require: PROVIDED, That the respective colleges shall pay the fees for any such bonds.

[ 2011 c 336 s 735; 1977 c 52 s 1.]

NOTES:

Regional universities—Designation: RCW 28B.35.010.